Massachusetts, session 194th, S2610.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of elementary
and secondary education, in consultation with the principals of the 5 recovery high schools in the
commonwealth, shall: (i) examine the costs associated with sending students to a recovery high
school, as defined in subsection (a) of section 91 of chapter 71 of the General Laws; (ii)
determine the average cost per pupil at recovery high schools in the commonwealth; and (iii)
determine, in consultation with the department of public health, whether enrollment in a recovery
high school should require a medical diagnosis of “substance use disorder or dependency, as
defined by the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders IV-TR”.
The department shall submit its findings to the chairs of the house and senate committees
on ways and means, the chairs of the joint committee on education and the chairs of the joint
committee on mental health, substance use and recovery not later than June 30, 2026.
of 1